District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.115

Adoption of acts to carry out subpart.

The Council of the District of Columbia shall adopt such acts as are necessary to carry out the purpose of this subpart within 180 days of October 27, 1978. No petition for recall may be presented to the District of Columbia Board of Elections and Ethics prior to October 1, 1978.

Mar. 10, 1978, D.C. Law 2-46, § 2, 24 DCR 199
Elections, recall of elected officials, see § 1-1001.17.
1981 Ed., § 1-295.
1973 Ed., § 1-195.